Louisiana, session 2026, HB1223.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 70 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3301 through 3306, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 70. LOUISIANA CLINICAL TRIAL COMPETITIVENESS AND
PATIENT ACCESS ACT
§3301. Purpose
A. The purpose of this Chapter is to make Louisiana more competitive for
clinical trials by supporting sponsor-facing readiness, speed-to-trial information,
external central institutional review board reliance, avoidance of unnecessary
duplicate institutional review board ethical review, patient access, role-based
collaboration, and statewide visibility of confirmed clinical-trial capabilities, while
preserving patient choice, institutional clinical authority, lawful local review, direct
sponsor relationships, confidential business information, and protected health
information.
Page 1 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
B. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to designate any research
entity, healthcare system, academic medical center, cancer program, clinical partner,
affiliate, or other person as the exclusive or preferred statewide provider, gateway,
broker, coordinator, sponsor-facing representative, or patient-referral destination for
covered clinical projects.
C. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to designate, deny, confer,
limit, or impair any research entity's status, role, application, partnership, eligibility,
or recognition with respect to National Cancer Institute designation, National Cancer
Institute-supported networks, federal grant requirements, accreditation standards,
cancer-center designation standards, or other federal or private designation programs.
D. Nothing in this Chapter shall require or authorize any action prohibited
by applicable federal law, federal regulation, or a binding federal award condition.
§3302. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Confidential business information" means nonpublic trade secret,
proprietary, competitively sensitive, commercially sensitive, sponsor-specific,
contract-research-organization-specific, research-entity-specific,
investigator-specific, or project-specific information, including trial pipelines,
feasibility, recruitment, referral strategy, contracts, budgets, rates, pricing, nonpublic
protocols, intellectual property, commercialization strategy, site-selection strategy,
sponsor strategy, or market strategy.
(2) "Contract research organization" means an organization that provides
clinical research services to a sponsor or trial manager.
(3)(a) "Covered clinical project" means an industry-sponsored interventional
clinical trial, or a federally supported interventional clinical trial designated by rule
or voluntary written election by the research entity, involving a drug, biologic,
medical device, radiopharmaceutical, diagnostic, combination product, or other
product regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration and conducted
or proposed to be conducted at a site located in this state. A Phase IV clinical trial
Page 2 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
is included only if interventional and designated by rule or voluntary written election
by the research entity.
(b) The term does not include a purely observational study, retrospective
chart review, registry-only study, quality-improvement activity, or expanded-access
treatment outside a clinical trial unless voluntarily included by the research entity or
designated by rule for a limited implementation purpose.
(4) "Department" means Louisiana Economic Development.
(5) "Designee" means a public or private entity, organizational unit,
contractor, or other person lawfully designated by the department to assist with
administrative, technical, market-facing, or implementation functions pursuant to this
Chapter. A designee shall be subject to the limitations, confidentiality restrictions,
patient-data restrictions, no-gatekeeper provisions, no-forced-routing provisions,
no-steering provisions, and antitrust-related limitations of this Chapter.
(6) "External central institutional review board" means an institutional
review board that serves as the single institutional review board or institutional
review board of record for a covered clinical project pursuant to a federally
compliant reliance arrangement; is registered in accordance with applicable federal
requirements; is not subject to an active federal restriction, suspension,
disqualification, or enforcement action that prohibits or materially limits review of
the covered clinical project; and is not the local institutional review board of the
research entity conducting the covered clinical project.
(7) "Patient-identifying information" means information that identifies or can
reasonably be used to identify a patient, research participant, or potential research
participant, including health, biological specimen, genomic, imaging, referral,
eligibility, or clinical information associated with that person.
(8) "Protected health information" has the same meaning as provided in 45
CFR 160.103.
(9)(a) "Research entity" means a hospital, academic institution, institutional
healthcare provider, healthcare system, private clinical research site, research
organization, cancer research program, academic medical center platform,
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
community oncology program, pediatric research program, translational research
program, or other institutional entity serving as a trial site or otherwise exercising
institutional responsibility for a covered clinical project at a site located in this state.
(b) The term does not include an individual healthcare provider acting solely
in an individual professional capacity and not on behalf of an institutional trial site.
(10) "Sponsor" means a pharmaceutical company, biotechnology developer,
medical device manufacturer, diagnostic developer, radiopharmaceutical developer,
academic sponsor, federal sponsor, foundation sponsor, or other entity advancing an
investigational product.
§3303. Department role; voluntary participation; limitations
A. The department may administer this Chapter and may act through a
designee.
B. The department may coordinate, verify, aggregate, and market voluntarily
provided or verified Louisiana clinical-trial capabilities to sponsors, contract
research organizations, federal partners, site-selection teams, and other persons
involved in clinical-trial development, site selection, patient access, or
economic-development activities in a neutral, nonexclusive, and capability-based
manner.
C. Department-coordinated marketing, capability-presentation,
sponsor-facing, site-identification, pilot, cooperative endeavor agreement, or other
implementation activity is voluntary and nonexclusive. No research entity, sponsor,
contract research organization, patient, or referring provider shall be required to use
or route communications through the department or its designee, or participate in
such activity, as a condition of conducting, considering, referring to, contracting for,
or participating in a covered clinical project.
D. A research entity may voluntarily provide capability, contact,
site-readiness, speed-to-trial, or role-based collaboration information to the
department or its designee for statewide clinical-trial marketing.
E. The department may enter into confidentiality agreements and other
lawful agreements to support implementation of this Chapter, to the extent permitted
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
by law. Nothing in this Chapter shall require a research entity, sponsor, or contract
research organization to provide the department or its designee with
patient-identifying information, protected health information, confidential business
information, feasibility information, trial-pipeline information, patient or referral
information, contract or budget terms, recruitment strategy, market strategy, or other
competitively sensitive information except pursuant to law or voluntary written
agreement.
F. Nothing in this Chapter shall authorize the department or its designee to
approve or disapprove a protocol, contract, budget, local operational determination,
site activation decision, patient referral, sponsor selection, contract research
organization selection, site-selection decision, clinical judgment, credentialing
decision, licensure determination, coverage determination, or federal research
determination.
G. Nothing in this Chapter shall transfer ownership of research programs,
clinical operations, faculty governance, medical judgment, licensure standards,
credentialing authority, contracting authority, budget authority, institutional review
authority, or clinical decision-making authority from a research entity to the
department or its designee.
H. A designee affiliated with a research entity, healthcare provider,
healthcare system, academic medical center, clinical partner, affiliate, or other
person that competes with a research entity shall not receive, collect, access, store,
transmit, or control another research entity's confidential business information,
patient-identifying information, protected health information, feasibility information,
trial-pipeline information, patient or referral information, contract or budget
information, recruitment strategy, market strategy, or other competitively sensitive
information unless each affected person provides written consent or the information
is otherwise lawfully available to the designee.
I. Coordination in accordance with this Chapter shall be nonexclusive and
shall not require or authorize allocation of markets, patients, sponsors, trials,
investigators, service lines, territories, prices, reimbursement, contract terms, budget
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
terms, referral sources, or commercial opportunities among research entities or other
persons.
§3304. Speed-to-trial and capability information
A. The department may establish by rule or guidance categories, formats,
and criteria for voluntarily provided or aggregate speed-to-trial and capability
information useful to sponsors, contract research organizations, and site-selection
teams.
B. Rules or guidance issued pursuant to this Section may vary by project
type, trial phase, therapeutic area, trial complexity, research entity type, site
capability, institutional infrastructure, sponsor or contract research organization
submission completeness, or voluntary participation in department-coordinated
activity.
C. No rule or guidance issued pursuant to this Section shall require final
contract execution, final budget agreement, study acceptance, site activation,
enrollment commitment, use of the department or its designee, or disclosure of
information protected by law or contract.
D. No research entity shall be required to route sponsor or contract research
organization communications, feasibility information, patient or referral information,
contract or budget terms, recruitment strategy, trial-pipeline information,
patient-access strategy, referral strategy, or other confidential business information
through another research entity, the department, or a designee affiliated with a
competing healthcare provider or research entity.
E. Nothing in this Chapter shall authorize the department, its designee, or
any research entity to require a sponsor, contract research organization, patient, or
referring provider to use a particular research entity, healthcare system, cancer
program, clinical partner, affiliate, or designee, or to route communications,
referrals, or confidential business information through a competing research entity,
except with the written consent of the affected parties and as otherwise authorized
by law.
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
F. Nothing in this Chapter shall prohibit voluntary collaboration,
consolidated feasibility responses, hub-and-spoke arrangements, decentralized trial
arrangements, teletrial arrangements, shared-investigator participation,
specialist-access planning, community-access partnerships, local follow-up support,
or patient-access support, where lawful, clinically appropriate, operationally feasible,
and consistent with patient consent, privacy law, institutional credentialing, sponsor
requirements, protocol requirements, and clinical judgment.
G. Nothing in this Chapter shall require a research entity to accept, open,
activate, or enroll a covered clinical project for which the research entity reasonably
determines that sufficient patient population, clinical expertise, investigator
availability, facility readiness, staffing, data capacity, credentialing, coverage
analysis, or operational capability is lacking.
§3305. External central institutional review board; local review
A. The requirements of this Section apply regardless of participation in
department-coordinated activity.
B. When an external central institutional review board is designated as the
institutional review board of record or has approved the covered clinical project, a
research entity shall not require separate local institutional review board approval or
conduct duplicate local institutional review board ethical review. Nothing in this
Subsection shall limit lawful local review preserved by this Section.
C. For a first-in-human clinical trial, Phase I clinical trial, early-feasibility
device trial, or dose-escalation trial, a research entity shall rely on an external central
institutional review board as the institutional review board of record where permitted
by law and where a federally compliant reliance arrangement is available, unless
external central institutional review board reliance is prohibited by federal law, state
law, or binding federal award condition, or the sponsor or its authorized
representative states in writing that the research entity's institutional review board
serve as the institutional review board of record.
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
D. A lack of a preexisting master agreement alone shall not make an external
central institutional review board unavailable if a lawful study-specific reliance
arrangement can be executed.
E. If an external central institutional review board has been designated as the
institutional review board of record, a request pursuant to Subsection C of this
Section or Paragraph (F)(1) of this Section is effective only if the sponsor or its
authorized representative withdraws that designation or confirms in writing that the
external central institutional review board is unavailable. If an external central
institutional review board has approved the covered clinical project, local
institutional review board ethical review shall not occur.
F. For a Phase II clinical trial or Phase III clinical trial, a research entity shall
rely on an external central institutional review board as the institutional review board
of record where permitted by law and where a federally compliant reliance
arrangement is available, unless either of the following applies:
(1) The sponsor or its authorized representative requests in writing that the
research entity's institutional review board serve as the institutional review board of
record.
(2) The chancellor, chief executive officer, or highest-ranking executive
officer of the research entity or institutional operating unit with formal legal or
operational responsibility for the covered clinical project approves and signs a
written project-specific exception based on one or more of the following:
(a) External central institutional review board reliance is prohibited by
federal law, state law, or binding federal award condition.
(b) Extraordinary project-specific circumstances involving project
feasibility, participant rights, safety, or welfare require review by the research
entity's own institutional review board for that covered clinical project.
(c) A specific federal or state legal requirement requires review by the
research entity's own institutional review board for that covered clinical project.
G.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter to the contrary, this
Section shall not apply to any clinical trial, clinical investigation, or study that is a
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
Phase IV clinical trial, a Phase 4 clinical trial, or otherwise postmarketing,
post-approval, post-authorization, post-clearance, or post-classification, if the trial,
investigation, or study is conducted after approval, licensure, clearance,
authorization, or classification by the United States Food and Drug Administration
of the product for the indication or use being studied, regardless of whether the trial,
investigation, or study is interventional, observational, required, requested, agreed
to, or voluntary. No rule, guidance, pilot, cooperative endeavor agreement, written
agreement, or other implementation material pursuant to this Chapter shall make
such a trial, investigation, or study subject to this Section. Nothing in this Paragraph
shall prohibit the voluntary use of an external central institutional review board when
otherwise lawful.
(2) For a covered clinical project not described in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection and designated by rule, pilot, cooperative endeavor agreement, or written
agreement of the affected parties, external central institutional review board reliance
standards may be established by rule, pilot, cooperative endeavor agreement, or
written agreement of the affected parties.
H. No approval required pursuant to Paragraph (F)(2) of this Section may be
delegated. The approving official shall be the chancellor, chief executive officer, or
highest-ranking executive officer of the research entity or institutional operating unit
with formal legal or operational responsibility for the covered clinical project. The
approving official shall not be the institutional review board chair, head of the local
institutional review board, direct supervisor of the head of the local institutional
review board, principal investigator, department chair, compliance officer, legal
counsel, or other person primarily responsible for institutional review board
administration or review, unless that person is also the highest-ranking executive
officer of the research entity or institutional operating unit with formal legal or
operational responsibility for the covered clinical project.
I. A written exception pursuant to Paragraph (F)(2) of this Section shall state
the basis for the exception with reasonable specificity, shall be limited to the covered
clinical project, and shall not establish a standing institutional exception. The
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
research entity shall transmit the written exception, or a summary sufficient to
identify the statutory basis for the exception, to the sponsor, contract research
organization if applicable, and the department or its designee in a form that does not
disclose patient-identifying information, protected health information, or confidential
business information.
J. An exception pursuant to Paragraph (F)(2) of this Section shall not be
based solely on institutional policy or preference, administrative convenience,
staffing limitation, customary practice, generalized concern regarding external
institutional review board review, preference for duplicate ethical review,
disagreement with the use of external institutional review boards generally, or desire
to control sponsor, referral, patient-access, or contracting relationships.
K. A research entity that relies on its own institutional review board pursuant
to this Section shall maintain documentation supporting such reliance and report
aggregate, non-identifiable information to the department on a schedule established
by rule or guidance, but not more frequently than semiannually. The report shall not
include patient-identifying information, protected health information, confidential
business information, sponsor-specific nonpublic information,
contract-research-organization-specific nonpublic information,
research-entity-specific nonpublic information, investigator-specific nonpublic
information, or project-specific nonpublic information. The department may set the
form and schedule for reports in accordance with this Subsection, but shall not
expand, narrow, waive, or modify the institutional review board requirements,
exceptions, prohibitions, or local-review protections established in this Section.
L. Nothing in this Chapter shall prohibit lawful local institutional review
relating to contracts, budgets, coverage analysis, investigator qualifications, conflicts
of interest, privacy, HIPAA, billing compliance, credentialing, pharmacy,
investigational-drug logistics, device logistics, radiation safety, radiopharmaceutical
handling, biosafety, cellular therapy readiness, BMT readiness, CAR-T readiness,
gene-therapy readiness, pediatric safeguards, facility readiness, site feasibility,
ancillary safety committees, local consent-language requirements, data security,
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
scientific review, disease-group review, Protocol Review and Monitoring System
review, Protocol Review and Monitoring Committee review, data and safety
monitoring, clinical protocol and data management, local context submissions, or
equivalent review required by law, applicable federal award conditions, accreditation
standards, cancer-center designation standards, reliance agreements, or written
objective institutional requirements directly related to local operational readiness,
participant safety, or institutional compliance.
M. Local institutional review preserved by this Section shall not be used to
duplicate institutional review board ethical review or delay a covered clinical project
based solely on institutional preference, generalized practice, administrative
convenience, staffing limitation, customary internal sequencing, or disagreement
with external central institutional review board reliance generally.
N. Nothing in this Chapter shall require a research entity to waive or
disregard legal requirements, safety obligations, federal research requirements,
federal award conditions, accreditation standards, cancer-center designation
requirements, reliance agreement responsibilities, or documented institutional
responsibilities.
§3306. Reporting; rulemaking; funds
A. The department may require only aggregate, non-identifiable information
reasonably necessary to evaluate implementation of this Chapter and may publish
aggregate reports, implementation summaries, speed-to-trial information, capability
information, and recommendations. Information required pursuant to this Subsection
shall not include patient-identifying information, protected health information,
confidential business information, sponsor-specific nonpublic information,
contract-research-organization-specific nonpublic information,
research-entity-specific nonpublic information, investigator-specific nonpublic
information, or project-specific nonpublic information unless provided pursuant to
law or voluntary written agreement.
B. Public reporting in accordance with this Chapter shall be aggregated and
shall not include patient-identifying information, protected health information,
Page 11 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
confidential business information, sponsor-specific nonpublic information,
contract-research-organization-specific nonpublic information,
research-entity-specific nonpublic information, investigator-specific nonpublic
information, or project-specific nonpublic information.
C. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to do any of the following:
(1) Create a state warranty of site performance, patient outcome, sponsor
selection, site selection, enrollment success, clinical outcome, federal designation,
regulatory approval, investment outcome, or commercial success.
(2) Create a private cause of action based solely on implementation of this
Chapter.
(3) Require disclosure of information prohibited from disclosure by federal
or state law or by enforceable contractual obligation.
(4) Require or authorize the department or its designee to receive, store,
transmit, access, control, collect, maintain, audit, or validate identifiable patient-level
data, source data, endpoint data, adverse-event data, protected health information,
or patient-identifying information except as authorized by federal and state law,
contract, protocol, consent, and applicable federal requirements.
(5) Create immunity from federal or state antitrust law, unfair trade practice
law, fraud law, abuse law, conflict-of-interest law, procurement law, or ethics law.
(6) Require or authorize market allocation, patient allocation, sponsor
allocation, trial allocation, referral-source allocation, price coordination,
contract-term coordination, budget-term coordination, or service-line allocation
among competitors.
D. The department may adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act to implement this Chapter and may issue guidance, templates,
reporting formats, capability tools, confidentiality procedures, conflict-of-interest
procedures, model provisions, and other nonregulatory implementation materials, but
only for the department's economic-development, speed-to-trial,
capability-presentation, marketing, aggregate-reporting, consultation,
voluntary-program, funding, and implementation functions pursuant to this Chapter.
Page 12 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
E. Rules or guidance may establish categories of covered clinical projects,
standards for voluntarily provided or aggregate speed-to-trial and capability
information, capability criteria, aggregate reporting formats, external central
institutional review board reliance procedures, exception procedures, confidentiality
procedures, role-based collaboration categories, hub-and-spoke models, teletrial
models, decentralized trial models, patient-access criteria, voluntary program
criteria, and phased implementation by project type, institution type, therapeutic
area, trial phase, site, or pilot cohort. Rules or guidance shall not authorize the
department or its designee to regulate clinical judgment, protocol content, site
activation decisions, contracting decisions, patient referrals, sponsor selection,
substantive institutional review board determinations, or local operational
determinations.
F. The department shall consult with research entities subject to this Chapter,
sponsors, contract research organizations, the Louisiana Department of Health,
patient-access stakeholders, privacy experts, clinical-trial operations experts, and
persons with relevant clinical, research, operational, contracting, regulatory,
academic medical center development, biomedical innovation, or
economic-development expertise.
G. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to require a specific
appropriation of funds or the creation of new positions. Subject to appropriation and
availability of funds, the department may seek, accept, and expend federal funds,
grants, gifts, donations, philanthropic contributions, private contributions,
cooperative endeavor funds, matching funds, and other lawful funds made available
for purposes of this Chapter.
H. Subject to appropriation, available funds, and applicable law, the
department may establish voluntary programs or enter into case-by-case cooperative
endeavor agreements or other written agreements to support this Chapter. Before
providing funds or other things of value, the department shall determine in writing
that the program or agreement serves a public purpose and reasonably advances
patient access, clinical-trial competitiveness, speed-to-trial, statewide capability
Page 13 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1223 ENROLLED
development, rural or underserved access, academic medical center development,
research investment, or another purpose of this Chapter. No program or agreement
shall confer market exclusivity, require use of or routing through the department or
its designee, require disclosure of information protected by law or contract, or
require surrender of the right to conduct, consider, refer to, contract for, or
participate in a covered clinical project independently.
Section 2. The requirements of this Act shall apply prospectively to covered clinical
projects for which the initial sponsor, contract research organization, site-selection, or
feasibility submission is received on or after the effective date of this Act. Requirements
established by rule, guidance, capability tool, criterion, or other implementation material
apply prospectively only after the effective date of that rule, guidance, tool, criterion, or
material.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 14 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.